Utah statutes.
54-18-302.   Public workshops.

After a public utility files the notice of intent in accordance with Subsection 54-18-301(3) and before it files a land use application, the public utility shall:

(1)  conduct informal public workshops at locations along the proposed corridor to provide information about:

(a)  the high voltage power line; and

(b)  the process for obtaining a land use permit; and

(2)  provide notice of the public workshops at least 14 days before a public workshop to:

(a)  a newspaper of general circulation in the target study area;

(b)  radio stations in the target study area; and

(c)  an affected entity.

